Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0980.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "cryptocurrency kiosk fraud prevention act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Cryptocurrency" means digital currency in which encryption techniques are used to regulate the generation of units of currency and verify the transfer of funds, and that operates independently of a central bank. (b) "Cryptocurrency kiosk" means an electronic terminal that enables a cryptocurrency kiosk operator to facilitate the purchase, sale, or exchange of fiat currency for cryptocurrency or of cryptocurrency for fiat currency. Cryptocurrency kiosk includes, but is not limited to, an electronic terminal that does either of the following: (i) Connects directly to a separate cryptocurrency exchange that performs the cryptocurrency transmission. (ii) Draws on cryptocurrency that is in the possession of the operator of the electronic terminal. (c) "Cryptocurrency kiosk operator" means a person that owns or operates a cryptocurrency kiosk. (d) "Fiat currency" means a medium of exchange that is authorized or adopted by the United States government as part of its currency and is not backed by a commodity. (e) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. Sec. 5. A person shall not do any of the following: (a) Install or operate a cryptocurrency kiosk. (b) Allow a cryptocurrency kiosk to be installed or operated on any premises that the person owns, leases, or controls. Sec. 7. A person that violates section 5 is responsible for a state civil infraction and may be ordered to pay a civil fine as follows: (a) For a first violation, not less than $2,000.00 and not more than $5,000.00. (b) For a second or subsequent violation, not less than $5,000.00 and not more than $10,000.00.